Utah statutes.
63I-1-234.   Repeal dates, Title 34A.

(1)  Section 34A-2-202.5 is repealed December 31, 2020.

(2)  Section 34A-2-705 and Subsection 59-9-101(2)(c)(iv) are repealed July 1, 2013.

(3)  Title 34A, Chapter 8a, Utah Injured Worker Reemployment Act, is repealed July 1, 2014.

